Hawaii statutes.
§378-2 Discriminatory practices made
unlawful; offenses defined. (a) It shall be an unlawful discriminatory
practice:

(1) Because of race, sex including gender identity or
expression, sexual orientation, age, religion, color, ancestry, disability, marital
status, arrest and court record, or domestic or sexual violence victim status
if the domestic or sexual violence victim provides notice to the victim's
employer of such status or the employer has actual knowledge of such status:

(A) For any employer to refuse to hire or
employ or to bar or discharge from employment, or otherwise to discriminate
against any individual in compensation or in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of employment;

(B) For any employment agency to fail or
refuse to refer for employment, or to classify or otherwise to discriminate
against, any individual;

(C) For any employer or employment agency to
print, circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated any statement,
advertisement, or publication or to use any form of application for employment
or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment, that
expresses, directly or indirectly, any limitation, specification, or
discrimination;

(D) For any labor organization to exclude or
expel from its membership any individual or to discriminate in any way against
any of its members, employer, or employees; or

(E) For any employer or labor organization to
refuse to enter into an apprenticeship agreement as defined in section 372-2;
provided that no apprentice shall be younger than sixteen years of age;

(2) For any employer, labor organization, or
employment agency to discharge, expel, or otherwise discriminate against any
individual because the individual has opposed any practice forbidden by this
part or has filed a complaint, testified, or assisted in any proceeding
respecting the discriminatory practices prohibited under this part;

(3) For any person, whether an employer, employee, or
not, to aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the doing of any of the discriminatory
practices forbidden by this part, or to attempt to do so;

(4) For any employer to violate the provisions of
section 121-43 relating to nonforfeiture for absence by members of the national
guard;

(5) For any employer to refuse to hire or employ or
to bar or discharge from employment any individual because of assignment of
income for the purpose of satisfying the individual's child support obligations
as provided for under section 571-52;

(6) For any employer, labor organization, or
employment agency to exclude or otherwise deny equal jobs or benefits to a
qualified individual because of the known disability of an individual with whom
the qualified individual is known to have a relationship or association;

(7) For any employer or labor organization to refuse
to hire or employ, bar or discharge from employment, withhold pay from, demote,
or penalize a lactating employee because the employee breastfeeds or expresses
milk at the workplace. For purposes of this paragraph, the term
"breastfeeds" means the feeding of a child directly from the breast;

(8) For any employer to refuse to hire or employ, bar
or discharge from employment, or otherwise to discriminate against any
individual in compensation or in the terms, conditions, or privileges of
employment of any individual because of the individual's credit history or
credit report, unless the information in the individual's credit history or
credit report directly relates to a bona fide occupational qualification under
section 378-3(2); or

(9) For any employer to discriminate against any
individual employed as a domestic, in compensation or in terms, conditions, or
privileges of employment because of the individual's race, sex including gender
identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, religion, color, ancestry,
disability, or marital status.

(b) For purposes of subsection (a)(1):

(1) An employer may verify that an employee is a
victim of domestic or sexual violence by requesting that the employee provide:

(A) A signed written statement from a person
listed below from whom the employee or the employee's minor child has sought
assistance in relation to the domestic or sexual violence:

(i) An employee, agent, or volunteer of a
victim services organization;

(ii) The employee's attorney or advocate;

(iii) The attorney or advocate of the employee's
minor child;

(iv) A medical or other health care
professional; or

(v) A member of the clergy; or

(B) A police or court record supporting the
occurrence of the domestic or sexual violence; and

(2) An employer may verify an employee's status as a
domestic or sexual violence victim not more than once every six months
following the date the employer:

(A) Was provided notice by the employee of
the employee's status as a domestic or sexual violence victim;

(B) Has actual knowledge of the employee's
status as a domestic or sexual violence victim; or

(C) Received verification that the employee
is a domestic or sexual violence victim;

provided that where the employee provides
verification in the form of a protective order related to the domestic or
sexual violence with an expiration date, the employer may not request any
further form of verification of the employee's status as a domestic or sexual
violence victim until the date of the expiration or any extensions of the
protective order, whichever is later. [L 1981, c 94, pt of §2; am L 1985, c
177, §1; am L 1986, c 223, §3; am L 1991, c 2, §3; am L 1992, c 33, §5; am L
1994, c 88, §1; am L 1999, c 172, §3; am L Sp 2009, c 1, §2; am L 2011, c 34,
§4 and c 206, §2; am L 2013, c 248, §2]

Note

L 1999, c 172, §5 provides:

"SECTION 5. Nothing in this Act [amending §378-2 and
enacting §378-10] prohibits employers from establishing internal rules and
guidelines for employees who may wish to breastfeed or express breastmilk in
the workplace."

Law Journals and Reviews

Canadian Pacific Cases: Kinoshita & Nakashima: What
Really Happened to the Employer? 22 HBJ, no. 1, at 75 (1989).

Two Growing Procedural Defenses in Common Law Wrongful
Discharge Cases--Preemption and Res Judicata. 11 UH L. Rev. 143 (1989).

The Protection of Individual Rights Under Hawai‘i's
Constitution. 14 UH L. Rev. 311 (1992).

Privacy and Genetics: Protecting Genetic Test Results in
Hawai‘i. 25 UH L. Rev. 449 (2003).

Viability of the Continuing Violation Theory in Hawai‘i
Employment Discrimination Law in the Aftermath of Ledbetter. 30 UH L. Rev. 423
(2008).

Case Notes

Not violated where employer discharged employees not merely
because of their drug-related arrests but because of perceived harm to
employer's reputation and business contracts. 803 F.2d 471 (1986).

Monocular pilot applicant's disability discrimination claim
and retaliation claim not preempted by Airline Deregulation Act of 1978; pilot
applicant's success or failure on the discrimination claim had no bearing on
pilot applicant's retaliation claim. 128 F.3d 1301 (1997).

Not unlawful for employer to discharge wife, who along with
husband, violated employer's policy by forming own company while still working
for employer. 558 F. Supp. 1229 (1983).

Plaintiff alleged that employer contravened letter and
purpose of section. 737 F. Supp. 1104 (1990).

Purpose is to protect claimants under workers' compensation
law. 749 F. Supp. 1023 (1990).

Because this section and §378-62 did not contain limitation
periods, court invoked State's general personal injury statute of limitations,
§657-7; plaintiff's state law claims barred where neither the collective
bargaining proceedings nor the equal employment opportunity commission
proceedings tolled the statute of limitations. 874 F. Supp. 1095 (1994).

Plaintiff brought forth evidence of a continuing series of
conduct which affected plaintiff and plaintiff's work environment; plaintiff's
sexual harassment claims may proceed using the evidence, even though much of it
predated limitations period; plaintiff may not rely on other proffered evidence
because to extent those actions raised claims, statute of limitations had
passed. 125 F. Supp. 2d 1224 (2000).

Defendant could not be liable in defendant's individual
capacity under paragraph (1)(A). 159 F. Supp. 2d 1211 (2001).

Plaintiff with diabetes was not substantially limited in any
major life activity and, therefore, was not disabled under this section or the
ADA. 161 F. Supp. 2d 1135 (2000).

Plaintiff asserted discrimination claims against plaintiff's
supervisor and employer, and the alleged parent company of the employer,
pursuant to chapter 378 and federal law. Defendants' motion for partial
dismissal or alternatively, for partial summary judgment granted in part (e.g.,
claims based on national origin and aiding and abetting) and denied in part
(e.g., claims based on color). 322 F. Supp. 2d 1101 (2004).

Defendant limited partner's motion to dismiss granted; among
other things, plaintiff did not allege sufficient facts in the second amended
complaint that would establish defendant's liability under paragraph (3). 351
F. Supp. 2d 1025 (2004).

Individuals are subject to liability under this section when
they act as agents of an employer. 396 F. Supp. 2d 1138 (2005).

Based on the plain language of §378-1 and paragraph (2),
plaintiff may not proceed under paragraph (2) against defendant, an individual
employee. Plaintiff stated no claim under paragraph (3), where plaintiff
claimed that defendant had incited, compelled, or coerced defendant into
discriminating. 405 F. Supp. 2d 1225 (2005).

Summary judgment granted for defendants (plaintiff's former
employer and former supervisor) regarding plaintiff's state law sexual
harassment claim brought pursuant to this section, where plaintiff did not meet
the statutory filing deadline pursuant to chapter 378 or the tort statute of
limitations for the claim. 468 F. Supp. 2d 1210 (2006).

The "single-filing" or "piggyback" rule
applied under Hawaii law, where the "dual-filed" equal employment
opportunity commission administrative complaints of four plaintiffs-intervenors
were filed after the 180-day deadline in §368-11(c) and the plaintiffs-intervenors
sought to "piggyback" on the timely administrative complaints of
three other plaintiffs-intervenors. 504 F. Supp. 2d 1008 (2007).

Where plaintiffs-intervenors' intentional infliction of
emotional distress/negligent infliction of emotional distress claims were
premised on a violation of this section, which provides a nonnegotiable state
right, and the alleged conduct at issue involved discrimination on the basis of
national origin and religion, the claims were not preempted by §301 of the
Labor Management Relations Act. 535 F. Supp. 2d 1149 (2008).

Plaintiff asserted claims for violation of Title I of the
Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and this section; plaintiff did not
establish a genuine issue of material fact that plaintiff was disabled pursuant
to any of the definitions of "disability" pursuant to the ADA and
this section. 586 F. Supp. 2d 1213 (2008).

Pre-2011 amendment to subsection (1): Hawaii supreme court
would apply the test prescribed by the United States Supreme Court in Oncale in
evaluating same-sex harassment and whether or not same-sex harassment
constitutes discrimination "because of sex" under this section. 721
F. Supp. 2d 947 (2010).

The Hawaii supreme court in French did not demonstrate a
clear attempt to keep Hawaii law distinct from the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act (ADA) such that a claim under the Hawaii discrimination law
raises issues sufficiently distinct from an ADA claim so as to prevent
application of the first-to-file-rule. 728 F. Supp. 2d 1096 (2010).

For Eleventh Amendment purposes, a suit against a state
official in that official's capacity is no different from a suit against the
State itself; Hawaii has not consented to suit in federal court for chapter 378
claims, and sovereign immunity thus barred plaintiff teacher's claims under
this section against the Hawaii department of education and the department of
education superintendent in the superintendent's official capacity. 855 F.
Supp. 2d 1155 (2012).

Where plaintiff claimed defendants aided and abetted the
commission of a discriminatory act prohibited by this chapter, plaintiff's
second amended complaint sufficiently pled factual allegations that stated a
plausible argument that defendants acted with malice. 892 F. Supp. 2d 1245
(2012).

Defendant's motion for summary judgment on plaintiff's claims
under paragraph (3) (2008) denied, where there were genuine issues of material
fact whether some of the conduct alleged by plaintiff resulted in an adverse employment
action. 907 F. Supp. 2d 1143 (2012).

Plaintiff could pursue claims under paragraph (3) (2008)
against defendants even though they were not named respondents in the equal
employment opportunity commission (EEOC) charges, where: (1) the county, a
named respondent in the charges, and defendant prosecuting attorney were
substantially identical parties and plaintiff had listed defendant as one of
the persons responsible for the alleged discrimination against plaintiff in the
EEOC questionnaire; and (2) other defendant was involved in the acts giving
rise to the claims in the charges. 907 F. Supp. 2d 1143 (2012).

Where defendants argued that plaintiff did not exhaust
administrative remedies as to claims under paragraph (3) (2008) because the aid
and abet allegation was not contained in any of plaintiff's equal employment
opportunity commission charges, plaintiff's claims were reasonably related to
allegations in the charge to the extent those claims were consistent with
certain claims expressly alleged against the county. 907 F. Supp. 2d 1143
(2012).

An age-based remark not made directly in the context of an
employment decision or uttered by a non-decisionmaker may be relevant,
circumstantial evidence of discrimination. However, the court did not find a
relationship between the remarks and the employment practices at issue that was
sufficient to establish discriminatory animus. 919 F. Supp. 2d 1101 (2013).

Plaintiff made a prima facie case of age and sex
discrimination by demonstrating that plaintiff: (1) belonged to a protected
class (male and 59 years old during the relevant time period); (2) performed
the job adequately; (3) suffered an adverse employment action; and (4) a
similarly situated, younger, female employee was treated differently. However,
defendant was entitled to summary judgment on plaintiff's age and sex
discrimination claims where plaintiff did not establish that defendant's
legitimate business reasons for selecting the younger, female candidate were
pretextual. 919 F. Supp. 2d 1101 (2013).

Defendant's motion for summary judgment denied where
plaintiff raised genuine issue of material fact as to whether plaintiff's
demotion was a result of national origin/ancestry or age discrimination. Even
though plaintiff was not actually from Mexico, plaintiff may maintain a "perceived
as" national origin claim if plaintiff was discriminated against based on
characteristics that led others to connect plaintiff to Mexico, such as
plaintiff's accent. Supervisor's alleged references to "old bags"
and "old clunkers", combined with statements such as "you old
people don't learn", raised an issue of fact as to whether supervisor had
an animus toward older individuals that may have played a role in supervisor's
decision to demote plaintiff. 927 F. Supp. 2d 978 (2013).

Defendant's motion for summary judgment granted as to
plaintiff's retaliation claims where plaintiff failed to identify the adverse
employment action plaintiff suffered in retaliation for plaintiff's exercise of
rights, and further, there was no causal link between the supposed adverse
employment action and plaintiff's exercise of rights. 927 F. Supp. 2d 978
(2013).

Plaintiff failed to demonstrate a prima facie case of sex
discrimination because plaintiff failed to identify any similarly situated
person outside of plaintiff's protected class who was treated more favorably.
937 F. Supp. 2d 1237 (2013).

Plaintiff failed to exhaust administrative remedies with
respect to certain events to the extent plaintiff sought relief in connection
with the events and presented the court with no applicable law that excused
exhaustion on the basis of futility. 937 F. Supp. 2d 1237 (2013).

Plaintiff submitted no evidence that raised a question of
fact regarding whether defendant former employer or former supervisor thought
plaintiff had a mental impairment. 937 F. Supp. 2d 1237 (2013).

Summary judgment granted to defendants on plaintiff's
disparate impact claims based on race, ancestry, and age, where, among other
things, plaintiff did not provide evidence that allowed the court to draw even
the inference that the former supervisor's criticism flowed from some
discriminatory animus on the former supervisor's part. 937 F. Supp. 2d 1237
(2013).

Evidence regarding claims of disparate treatment based on age
was direct; the alleged comment by the chief investigator regarding plaintiff's
age not only reflected a negative attitude toward older workers, it indicated
an intent to fill plaintiff's former supervisory position with a younger person
because plaintiff was simply "too old"; summary judgment in favor of
defendant denied. 938 F. Supp. 2d 1000 (2013).

Summary judgment granted to defendant regarding: (1) any
"hostile work environment" claims plaintiff may have been trying to
assert, as plaintiff provided no evidence establishing that plaintiff's
workplace was permeated with discriminatory intimidation relating to
plaintiff's national origin or age; and (2) plaintiff's retaliation claims, as
plaintiff failed to show evidence that plaintiff engaged in protected activity,
was thereafter subjected to an adverse employment action, and that there was a
causal link between the protected activity and the adverse employment action.
938 F. Supp. 2d 1000 (2013).

Treating plaintiff's evidence relating to national origin
discrimination, i.e., the alleged comment by the chief investigator and/or
administrator reportedly referring to a need "to make the office
safe" from plaintiff because plaintiff was "a typical Samoan",
as "specific" and "substantial", plaintiff raised questions
of fact as to plaintiff's claims of disparate treatment based on national
origin in violation of this section and Title VII. 938 F. Supp. 2d 1000
(2013).

Plaintiff presented no evidence regarding adverse employment
actions taken against any other employee of defendant, much less any employee
who could fall within the protected class for an age discrimination claim,
regarding plaintiff's age discrimination claims based upon theories of
disparate impact or "pattern-or-practice". 963 F. Supp. 2d 1002
(2013).

Employee's motion for summary judgment denied, where
plaintiff claimed disparate treatment in violation of the age discrimination
provision in this section; among other things, (1) there was sufficient
evidence from which a fact-finder could conclude that plaintiff's demotion was
not voluntary; (2) the combination of plaintiff's supervisor's alleged
statements of animus and the allegedly better treatment of a co-worker
constituted sufficient evidence to meet the minimal burden required to defeat
summary judgment; there was at least a question of fact as to whether age-based
discrimination was the "but for" cause of plaintiff's demotion; and
(3) drawing all reasonable inferences in plaintiff's favor, the court could not
determine that the "same actor" inference applied. 979 F. Supp. 2d
1069 (2013).

Employer's motion for summary judgment granted as to
plaintiff's hostile work environment claims, where plaintiff failed to meet
plaintiff's burden of showing that there was a triable issue as to whether the
work environment was permeated with discriminatory intimidation. Among other
things, while plaintiff detailed several instances in which plaintiff was
allegedly harassed or mistreated by plaintiff's supervisor, plaintiff did not
provide evidence from which a jury could tell that these were incidents of
"discriminatory intimidation" rather than just bad treatment. 979 F.
Supp. 2d 1069 (2013).

Defendant employer was entitled to summary judgment as to
plaintiff's discrimination claims based on race, where, among other things,
plaintiff did not allege any facts linking supervisor's conduct to race-based
animus, and plaintiff identified only sporadic or unquantified incidents over a
three-year period of alleged racial harassment by other employees. 979 F.
Supp. 2d 1083 (2013).

Defendant employer was not entitled to summary judgment on
plaintiff's disability discrimination claims under the Americans with
Disabilities Act and this section, where a reasonable jury could find that
plaintiff's back and shoulder injuries substantially limited plaintiff's
ability to stand, and there were genuine issues of fact as to whether plaintiff
was a qualified individual (e.g., plaintiff's evidence raised a triable issue
of fact as to whether standing and rarely sitting was an essential function of
the armed security guard position, defendant never engaged in any interactive
process, and the record established that an accommodation was reasonable and
available). 979 F. Supp. 2d 1083 (2013).

Plaintiff's motion for reconsideration regarding plaintiff's
retaliation claims under Title VII, Age Discrimination in Employment Act, and
this section denied; although statements indicated that there may be causation
between plaintiff's termination and an internal problems letter, the complaints
in the internal problems letter about another in-house salesperson's alleged
attempts to manipulate managers and the managers' alleged favoritism did not
concern a protected trait; thus, plaintiff's submission of the letter and
plaintiff's related complaints did not constitute a protected activity under
this section. 988 F. Supp. 2d 1184 (2013).

Defendant's application of the "Staffing Policy
SH-2" to plaintiff and plaintiff's husband in 2011 and defendant's finding
a violation of the policy raised a genuine issue of material fact whether they
constituted circumstantial evidence that the policy was applied in a
discriminatory manner. 19 F. Supp. 3d 1012 (2014).

Defendant's "Staffing Policy SH-2" as applied to
plaintiff violated the plain language and purpose of this section, unless the
termination or other adverse action fell within one of the exceptions in
§378-3. Because there was a genuine issue of material fact as to whether an
exception in §378-3 applied, the court denied defendant's motion for summary
judgment with respect to plaintiff's marital status discrimination claim. 19
F. Supp. 3d 1012 (2014).

Genuine issue of material fact existed as to whether
defendant's proffered reasons for finding a violation of the working
relationship of plaintiff and plaintiff's husband, and removing plaintiff from
a project where plaintiff's husband was the program manager, were pretextual.
Plaintiff created a triable issue of material fact concerning discrimination
under the McDonnell Douglas burden-shifting framework. Defendant's motion for
summary judgment with respect to plaintiff's marital status discrimination
claim denied. 19 F. Supp. 3d 1012 (2014).

Where plaintiff brought several retaliation claims against
defendant, (1) plaintiff offered sufficient evidence to raise a genuine issue
of material fact as to whether defendant's reasons for not actively deploying
plaintiff were pretextual; (2) there was a genuine issue of material fact as to
whether there were any available engineering positions available for plaintiff
on Kauai, and there was a triable issue of material fact as to whether
defendant's reason for beginning the termination process was pretextual; and
(3) defendant's motion for summary judgment granted with respect to plaintiff's
retaliation claim arising from alleged instances of protected activity in
January and February 2011, where, among other things, plaintiff was required
to, but failed to, exhaust plaintiff's administrative remedies. 19 F. Supp. 3d
1012 (2014).

Violated by company policy requiring termination of person
married to someone in same department unless termination falls under exception
in §378-3. 72 H. 350, 816 P.2d 302 (1991).

Defendant's policy prohibiting persons related by blood or
marriage from working in the same department, as applied to plaintiff, violated
plain language and purpose of this section, unless the termination fell within
one of the exceptions in §378-3. 76 H. 454, 879 P.2d 1037 (1994).

In action alleging unlawful discharge in violation of this
section, time for filing administrative complaint begins to run on date that
employee is actually discharged, that is, on date that employment terminates.
76 H. 454, 879 P.2d 1037 (1994).

Where record contained numerous instances of both physical
and verbal conduct of a sexual nature by doctor towards complainant and others,
complainant never solicited or incited doctor's conduct, and conduct had effect
of creating an intimidating, hostile, and offensive work environment, there was
sufficient evidence to support commission's determination that doctor violated
paragraph (1)(A) and Hawaii administrative rule §12-46-109(a)(3). 88 H. 10,
960 P.2d 1218 (1998).

Based on definition of "employer" in §378-1,
legislature intended all employers, regardless of size, to be subject to the
provisions of this chapter, including paragraph (1)(A). 89 H. 269, 971 P.2d
1104 (1999).

Employer's policy of denying any extended leave during
employee's first year of employment violated Hawaii administrative rule
§12-46-108, which was adopted to enforce the legislative mandate of paragraph
(1)(A) and Hawaii's constitutional prohibition against sex discrimination in
the exercise of a person's civil rights in employment. 89 H. 269, 971 P.2d
1104 (1999).

Where plaintiff in age discrimination suit did not meet
plaintiff's burden of establishing that defendant's articulated reason for
taking adverse employment action against plaintiff was pretextual, and
plaintiff did not give any other evidence that would give rise to a genuine issue
of material fact, trial court properly granted summary judgment. 94 H. 368, 14
P.3d 1049 (2000).

A compensation discrimination claim under paragraph (1) must
satisfy the following three-part test: (1) plaintiff must first establish a
prima facie case of discrimination; (2) defendant must then provide a
legitimate, nondiscriminatory reason for the pay differences; and (3) if
defendant articulates such a reason, plaintiff must then show that the reason
given by defendant is pretexual. 96 H. 408, 32 P.3d 52 (2001).

A retaliation claim under paragraph (2) is subject to a
three-part test: (1) plaintiff must first establish a prima facie case of
retaliation; (2) defendant must then provide a legitimate, nondiscriminatory
reason for the adverse employment action; and (3) if defendant articulates such
a reason, plaintiff must then show that the reason given by defendant is
pretexual. 96 H. 408, 32 P.3d 52 (2001).

To establish a "hostile environment" sexual
harassment claim, claimant must show that he or she was subjected to sexual
advances, requests for sexual favors, or other verbal or physical conduct or
visual forms of harassment of a sexual nature; the conduct was unwelcome,
severe or pervasive, and had the purpose or effect of either unreasonably interfering
with claimant's work performance or creating an intimidating, hostile, or
offensive work environment; that claimant actually perceived the conduct as
having such purpose or effect; and claimant's perception was objectively
reasonable to a person of claimant's gender in same position. 97 H. 376, 38
P.3d 95 (2001).

Plaintiff was, as a matter of law, unable to maintain a sex
discrimination claim based on retaliation under paragraph (2) where allegations
described by plaintiff did not involve any discrimination based on sex, and
plaintiff clarified that female co-worker's conduct created a hostile work
environment not only for plaintiff, but for plaintiff's staff, which included
both males and females. 100 H. 149, 58 P.3d 1196 (2002).

Where co-worker sexually assaulted employee by grabbing
employee's buttocks, conduct was sufficiently severe to constitute actionable
sexual harassment; trial court erred in granting summary judgment for employer
where there were genuine issues of material fact as to whether employer's
response to buttock-grabbing incident was reasonably calculated to end
co-worker's harassment. 104 H. 423, 91 P.3d 505 (2004).

Trial court correctly ruled that appellant was precluded from
bringing a claim of gender discrimination under this section where, under the
circumstances, gender discrimination alleged in the civil complaint could not
be said to be "consistent with appellant's original theory of the
case" as submitted to the Hawaii civil rights commission. 105 H. 462, 99
P.3d 1046 (2004).

Trial court properly granted summary judgment where appellant
failed to establish a prima facie showing of a violation of this section,
either on a theory of pattern or practice discrimination or of disparate
treatment age discrimination. 105 H. 462, 99 P.3d 1046 (2004).

An employee may bring action against employer for intentional
infliction of emotional distress caused by discrimination in violation of this
section, and this action is not barred by exclusivity provision of §386-5. 87
H. 57 (App.), 951 P.2d 507 (1998).

Where unclear from record that appropriate elements of
discriminatory employment discharge claim based on race or ancestry under this
section were considered, summary judgment improper. 87 H. 57 (App.), 951 P.2d
507 (1998).

Where plaintiff's disability prevented plaintiff from being
qualified to perform the essential functions of the ACO IV (prison guard)
position, with or without reasonable accommodation, plaintiff failed to
establish a prima facie case that plaintiff had lost plaintiff's position due
to disability discrimination; also, because plaintiff could not show that
plaintiff was qualified for the ACO IV position, plaintiff also failed to
establish a prima facie case that plaintiff had lost plaintiff's position due
to race or gender discrimination under this section. 119 H. 288 (App.), 196
P.3d 290 (2008).

Circuit court erred in granting summary judgment against
plaintiff employee on plaintiff's claim under this section where a genuine
issue of material fact existed as to whether defendant employer's stated
reasons for plaintiff employee's termination, undertaking cost-cutting
restructuring measures following bankruptcy, lacked credibility and were
pretextual. 130 H. 325 (App.), 310 P.3d 1026 (2013).

Cited: 760 F. Supp. 2d 1005 (2010).

Mentioned: 800 F. Supp. 882 (1992).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next